Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 42.720 TO 42.742 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 1/30/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1875
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Avatar-based virtual encounter system" means a digital, interactive
platform that enables a user to participate in a virtual health-related
encounter through one (1) or more computer-generated avatars
representing an automated interface, a participating health care provider, a
user, or a partner institution tethered together within a single, unified visual
environment;
(b) "Health management services":
1. Means nonclinical, health-related ancillary services;
2. Includes:
a. Providing information on preventative services or services
designed to slow the progression of chronic diseases, including
screenings for basic human needs and referrals to appropriate
services and agencies to meet those needs;
b. Health promotion education to prevent illness or disease,
including the promotion of health behaviors and diets to increase
awareness and prevent the development of illness or disease;
c. Facilitation between a user and a health care provider when
cultural factors, such as language, socioeconomic status, or
health literacy, become a barrier to properly understanding
treatment options or treatment plans;
d. Diagnosis-related user education regarding self-management of
physical and mental health and treatment plan compliance;
e. Assisting users in understanding and comprehending their
electronic medical records;
f. Connecting users to local health care providers and assisting
with appointment scheduling;
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 1/30/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1875
g. Providing access for telehealth interactions with licensed health
care providers;
h. Routine follow-up assistance; and
i. Recommending that a user seek emergency care; and
3. Does not include:
a. The practice of medicine; or
b. Diagnosing or treating any disease, illness, or medical condition;
and
(c) "Rural health care providers and facilities" means licensed health care
providers and facilities that are located in:
1. Nonmetropolitan counties;
2. Outlying metropolitan counties with no population from an urban
area of fifty thousand (50,000) or more;
3. Census tracts with Rural-Urban Commuting Areas codes 4-10 in
metropolitan counties; or
4. Large census tracts of at least four hundred (400) square miles in
metropolitan counties with a population density of thirty-five (35) or
fewer people per square mile and Rural-Urban Commuting Area
codes 2-3.
(2) (a) There is hereby created within the Commonwealth Office of Technology an
agency of state government to be known as Kentucky Health Command.
(b) The Kentucky Health Command shall:
1. Employ a full-time director who shall:
a. Be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor; and
b. Have knowledge of and experience in artificial intelligence-
based technology platforms;
2. No later than January 1, 2027, designate and contract, in accordance
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/30/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1875
with KRS Chapter 45A, with a private sector entity to develop and
provide standards and qualifications, in accordance with subsection
(4) of this section, for the utilization of an artificial intelligence-
assisted virtual health platform to be made available to rural health
care providers and facilities; and
3. Establish, through the promulgation of administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, a process:
a. By which rural health care providers and facilities may contract,
or enter into an end user licensing agreement, for the use of the
artificial intelligence-assisted virtual health platform; and
b. For the equitable sharing of net advertising revenues. The
revenue sharing process developed under this subparagraph
shall:
i. Prioritize reimbursing the state for the initial costs
associated with development of the artificial intelligence-
assisted virtual health platform; and
ii. Once the state has recouped costs associated with
development of the artificial intelligence-assisted virtual
health platform, distribute at least eighty percent (80%) of
net advertising revenues from the platform to participating
rural health care providers and facilities based the rate of
utilization.
(3) The artificial intelligence-assisted virtual health platform shall:
(a) Be designed to enable user-initiated health management services;
(b) Have the capability of using an avatar-based virtual encounter system;
(c) Present the user interaction together with identifying information of
participating rural health care providers and facilities, accreditation
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/30/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1875
indicators, or other authorized entities, and may link or tether avatar
interactions to health-related data for the purposes of health management
services, navigation, education, referral, and the contextual presentation of
health-related information, resources, or promotions relevant to the user's
needs; and
(d) Not include or engage in the practice of medicine or the diagnosis or
treatment of any disease, illness, or medical condition.
(4) The standards and qualifications for utilization of the artificial intelligence-
assisted virtual health platform shall:
(a) Require that the developer contracted under subsection (2) of this section
holds the necessary patent or legal or licensing rights to the platform and
related technologies;
(b) Establish a process for the sharing and transfer of health data while
protecting user privacy, including certification of electronic health records,
interoperability, algorithm transparency, and other information sharing;
(c) Establish guardrails to prevent users from receiving misinformation and to
prevent the platform from offering or providing any service that would
constitute the practice of medicine or the provision of regulated health care
services;
(d) Permit the display of commercial advertising, sponsored content, and paid
promotions relevant to the user's health needs;
(e) Require that commercial advertising, sponsored content, and paid
promotions comply with all relevant state and federal laws and
administrative regulations related to medical advertising; and
(f) Include any other standards or qualifications deemed necessary to protect
users while optimizing and leveraging available technologies to promote
efficient delivery of health management services.
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/30/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1875
Section 2. KRS 42.724 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created within the Finance and Administration Cabinet an agency
of state government known as the Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(2) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall be headed by an executive director,
also known as the chief information officer, appointed by the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet and approved by the Governor. Duties and
functions of the executive director shall include serving on the Governor's
Executive Cabinet and those established in KRS 42.730.
(3) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall consist of the following offices,
each headed by an executive director and organized into divisions headed by a
division director:
(a) Office of Infrastructure Services, consisting of the:
1. Division of Network Services; and
2. Division of Platform Services;
(b) Office of Architecture and Governance, consisting of the:
1. Division of Enterprise Solutions;
2. Division of Mainframe Services;
3. Division of Geographic Information Systems; and
4. Division of Governance and Strategy;
(c) Office of the Chief Information Security Officer. The office shall ensure the
efficiency and effectiveness of information technology security functions and
responsibilities;[ and]
(d) Office of Client Support Services, consisting of the:
1. Division of Field Services; and
2. Division of Support Services; and
(e) Kentucky Health Command. The command shall oversee the development
and operation of an artificial intelligence-assisted virtual health platform in
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/30/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1875
accordance with Section 1 of this Act.
(4) Executive directors and division directors appointed under this section shall be
appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/30/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed